Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 21 Victim Impact Statements

§ 7-21-101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Crime” means a felony as defined by W.S.

6-10-101

;

“Family member” means a spouse, child, sibling, parent or legal guardian of a victim;

“Victim” means an individual who has suffered direct or threatened physical, emotional or financial harm as the result of the commission of a crime or a family member of a minor, incompetent person or a homicide victim;

“Victim impact statement” means an oral or written statement by the victim of a crime providing the information specified by W.S. 7-21-102(c).

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 112, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

“Victim.” —

Neighbor of homicide victim qualified as a victim, and his statement was properly admitted to trial court. Trusky v. State, 7 P.3d 5,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 2000).

Nonvictims.—

In a case in which defendant pleaded guilty to second degree murder, and was sentenced to serve 75 years to life in prison, the trial court did not commit plain error by considering statements from individuals who did not meet the statutory definition of victim; the trial court could consider statements from persons other than the victim. Town v. State, 2015 WY 78, 351 P.3d 257,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2015).

Inadmissibility of victim impact statements in death penaltycases. —

Neither the Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-102

death penalty statute nor Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

7-21-101

through 103 general victim impact statutes authorize the introduction of victim impact evidence during capital sentencing, and the trial court errs in allowing its introduction; such error, however, is subject to harmless error analysis. Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

Brown v. State, 2005 WY 37, 109 P.3d 52,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(2005); Thompson v. State, 2014 WY 89,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 97

, 2014 WL 3400960 (Jul 14, 2014).

§ 7-21-102.
Notice to crime victims.

If a defendant is convicted of a crime involving an identifiable victim, the district attorney, upon and in accordance with the request of the victim, shall give to the victim notice of the following:

The defendant’s conviction;

The offenses for which the defendant was convicted and the possible sentences for each offense;

The victim’s opportunity to make a written or oral impact statement for use in the preparation of the presentence investigation report concerning the defendant when a presentence investigation report is to be prepared;

The address and telephone number of the probation office which is to prepare the presentence investigation report;

That a presentence investigation report and any statement of the victim included in the report will be made available to the defendant;

The victim’s opportunity to make an impact statement at sentencing or at any subsequent hearing for correction or reduction of sentence; and

The time and place of the sentencing proceeding and the time and place of any subsequent hearing for correction or reduction of sentence.

The notice given by the district attorney to the victim pursuant to this section shall be given by any means reasonably calculated to give prompt actual notice.

A notice given under subsection (a) of this section shall inform the victim that his impact statement may include but shall not be limited to the following:

An explanation of the nature and extent of any physical, psychological or emotional harm or trauma suffered by the victim;

An explanation of the extent of any economic loss or property damage suffered by the victim;

The need for and extent of restitution and whether the victim has applied for or received compensation for loss or damage; and

The victim’s recommendation for an appropriate disposition.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 112, § 1; 1991, ch. 191, § 1.

Credible evidence. —

Information contained in a victim impact statement is credible evidence upon which district court may impose a restitution amount. Brock v. State, 967 P.2d 26,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1998).

Evidence sufficient to estimate victim's loss. —

District court did not abuse its discretion in sentencing defendant to make restitution in the amount of $500, where mother of minor with whom defendant had taken indecent liberties requested in victim impact statement that defendant pay her insurance policy deductible of $500 to cover costs of counseling for daughter; this information was sufficient to afford a reasonable basis for estimating the victim's loss. Brock v. State, 967 P.2d 26,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1998).

Victim's impact statement. —

Even if defendant was correct in assertion that he was given ‘no meaningful alternative’ other than proceeding to trial, because he was charged with three prior felonies and had to be found innocent to avoid a mandatory life sentence, claim was rejected that testimony at trial from officers about shootings were relied on in imposing a ‘severe’ sentence; if case had not proceeded to trial, the district court inevitably would have been informed of the circumstances surrounding the crime through the presentence investigation report, factual basis for his guilty plea, and the officers' testimony at sentencing in the form of victim impact statements. Hopson v. State, 2006 WY 32, 130 P.3d 494,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2006).

Stated

in

Mehring v. State, 860 P.2d 1101,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 7-21-103.
Submission of victim impact statement to sentencing court.

At any hearing to determine, correct or reduce a sentence, an identifiable victim of the crime may submit, orally, in writing or both, a victim impact statement to the court.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 17, § 2.

Any victim impact statement submitted to the court pursuant to this section shall be among the factors considered by the court in determining the sentence to be imposed upon the defendant or in determining whether there should be a correction or reduction of sentence.

Any failure to comply with the terms of this chapter shall not create a cause for appeal or reduction of sentence for the defendant, or a civil cause of action against any person by the defendant.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 112, § 1; 1991, ch. 191, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2005, ch. 17, §§ 1, 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote and restructured (a) to clarify when and how a victim impact statement may be submitted.

Purpose of this section

is to permit the sentencing court to consider information about the harm caused by the defendant during the commission of the particular crime for which sentence is about to be imposed. Mehring v. State, 860 P.2d 1101,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1993).

Statement improperly considered. —

Trial court erred in considering a victim impact statement from defendant's daughter because such statements are limited to the victims of crimes for which a defendant is being sentenced, and the charge against defendant concerning the daughter had been dropped. Bitz v. State, 2003 WY 140, 78 P.3d 257,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 2003).

No error shown. —

Mere submission of a victim impact statement and presentence investigation report that contains statements from individuals who may be beyond those affected by the charged crimes does not without more constitute a procedural error in sentencing or prosecutorial misconduct; therefore, in a case involving sexual assault and indecent acts with a minor, error was not shown based on the fact that other statements were included.
Hubbard v. State, 2008 WY 12, 175 P.3d 625,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2008).

District court properly exercised its discretion in sentencing defendant, a high school teacher who was convicted of having had improper sexual relations with three students, because the fact that two of defendant's victims testified on defendant's behalf did not qualify their testimony as more credible, or warrant special status more so than the victim that did not testify. Thompson v. State, 2014 WY 89, 330 P.3d 804,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2014).

Nonvictims.—

In a case in which defendant pleaded guilty to second degree murder, and was sentenced to serve 75 years to life in prison, the trial court did not commit plain error by considering statements from individuals who did not meet the statutory definition of victim; the trial court could consider statements from persons other than the victim. Town v. State, 2015 WY 78, 351 P.3d 257,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2015).

Neighbor of victim. —

Neighbor of homicide victim qualified as a victim, and his statement was properly admitted under this section. Trusky v. State, 7 P.3d 5,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 2000).

Victim impact evidence is admissible in guilt phase of trial for credibility purposes.

Barnes v. State, 858 P.2d 522,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

Noel v. State, 2014 WY 30,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Feb 25, 2013); Noel v. State, 2014 WY 30,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Feb 25, 2013); Noel v. State, 2014 WY 30, 2013 Wyo. LEXIS 170 (Feb 25, 2013).

Quoted in

Deeds v. State, 2014 WY 124,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Oct. 3, 2014).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Victim impact evidence in capital sentencing hearings — post-Payne v. Tennessee, 79 ALR5th 33.